Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1159.
do enact as follows:AB1159,11Section 1. 348.15 (3) (bg) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1159,2,152348.15 (3) (bg) In the case of a vehicle or combination of vehicles transporting 3exclusively milk from the point of production to the primary market and the return 4of dairy supplies and dairy products from such primary market to the farm or 5transporting exclusively maple sap or maple syrup from the point of collection or 6production to storage or the primary market, the gross weight imposed on the 7highway by the wheels of any one axle may not exceed 21,000 pounds or, for 2 axles 88 or less feet apart, 37,000 pounds or, for groups of 3 or more consecutive axles more 9than 9 feet apart, a weight of 2,000 pounds more than is shown in par. (c), but not to 10exceed 80,000 pounds. This paragraph does not apply to the transportation of milk 11or dairy supplies and dairy products on highways designated as part of the national 12system of interstate and defense highways, except for the I 39 corridor and the I 41 13corridor. This paragraph does not apply to the transportation of maple sap or 14maple syrup on highways designated as part of the national system of interstate 15and defense highways.AB1159,21Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1159,3,42(1) Exception to review by the department of transportation. 3Notwithstanding s. 13.096 (2), the department of transportation may not prepare a 4report on this bill under s. 13.096 (2) and (3).AB1159,35Section 3. Initial applicability.AB1159,3,76(1) This act first applies to vehicles operated on the effective date of this 7subsection.AB1159,3,88